Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1422
Commission; members; quorum.

Ten members of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business or the exercise of any power of the commission. The commission shall have the power to act by a majority of the members present at any meeting at which a quorum is in attendance.

Laws 1969, c. 774, § 8, p. 2934;

Laws 1994, LB 971, § 14.